California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of Section 7145 or of a regulation requiring a license to be displayed is an infraction, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a first offense. If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 7145 or of a regulation requiring a license to be displayed within five years of a separate offense resulting in a conviction of a violation of Section 7145 or of a regulation requiring a license to be displayed, that person shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) If a person is convicted of a violation of
 Section 7145 or of a regulation requiring a license to be displayed and produces in court a license issued pursuant to Section 7145 and valid at the time of the person’s arrest, and if the taking was otherwise lawful with respect to season, limit, time, and area, the court may reduce the fine imposed for the violation of Section 7145 or of the regulation requiring a license to be displayed to twenty-five dollars ($25).

(c) If a person is charged with a violation of Section 7145 or of a regulation requiring a license to be displayed, and produces in court a lifetime sport fishing license issued in his or her name pursuant to Section 7149.2,
 and if the taking was otherwise lawful, in terms of season, limit, time, and area, the court may dismiss the charge.

(d) A person shall not be charged or convicted for both a violation of Section 7145 and a regulation requiring a license to be displayed for the same act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 33.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.2.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of any of the following is an infraction, punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50), or more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), for a first offense:

(1) Subdivision (a) of Section 6596.1.

(2) Subdivision (a) of Section 7149.45.

(b) If a person is convicted of a violation of any of the sections listed in subdivision (a) within five years of a separate offense resulting in a conviction of a violation of any of those sections, that person shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) If a person convicted of a violation of any of the sections listed in subdivision (a) produces in court the applicable sport fishing ocean enhancement validation, second rod sport fishing validation, or Colorado River special use validation issued pursuant to this code and valid at the time of the person’s arrest, and if the taking was otherwise lawful with respect to season, limit, time, and area, the court may reduce the fine imposed for the violation to twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 211.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of Section 7121 for the sale, purchase, or receipt of fish taken by a person required to be licensed pursuant to Section 7145 is punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) If the violation in question involved the illegal sale or purchase of abalone taken by a person required to be licensed pursuant to Section 7145, the violation is punishable by a fine of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

(c) If the violation in question involved a person who knowingly purchased or received for commercial purposes, fish taken by a person required to be licensed pursuant to Section 7145, the violation is punishable by a fine of not less than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.4.

(a) In addition to any other applicable penalty, the commercial boat registration of a commercial passenger fishing boat may be revoked or suspended by the commission, when requested by the department, for a period not to exceed one year, upon conviction of the registrant, or the registrant’s agent, servant, employee, or any other person acting under the registrant’s direction or control, for a violation of Section 7121 or a regulation adopted pursuant to that section, if the violation in question involves that boat.

(b) In addition to any other applicable penalty, the commercial boat registration of a commercial passenger fishing boat may be revoked or suspended by the commission, when requested by the department, for a
 period not to exceed one year, upon conviction of any person other than the person specified in subdivision (a), for a violation of Section 7121, if the fish or amphibians involved in the violation were taken from that boat, and the person committing the violation had committed a prior violation of Section 7121 involving that boat within the previous three years.

(c) A commercial boat registration shall not be revoked under this section for a violation committed without the knowledge of the master, or an agent or employee of the registrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 212.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 12002, a violation of Section 1764 is an infraction, not a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500). If a person convicted of a violation of Section 1764 is granted probation, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person pay at least the minimum fine prescribed in this subdivision.

(b) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 1764 and produces in court a valid wildlife area pass, the court may reduce the fine imposed for the violation of Section 1764 to fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 213.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.6.

(a) In addition to any other applicable penalty, a commercial boat registration may be revoked or suspended by the commission, when requested by the department, for a period not to exceed one year, upon the second conviction in three years of the registrant, or the registrant’s agent, servant, employee, or any other person acting under the registrant’s direction or control, for a violation of any of the following provisions or regulations adopted pursuant thereto:

(1) Section 5521 or 5521.5.

(2) Article 2 (commencing with Section 8150.5), Article 3 (commencing with Section 8180), Article 4 (commencing with Section 8210.2), Article 5 (commencing with Section
 8250), Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275), Article 9 (commencing with Section 8370), Article 13 (commencing with Section 8495), and Article 15 (commencing with Section 8550) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(3) Article 1 (commencing with Section 8601), Article 2 (commencing with Section 8623), Article 4 (commencing with Section 8660), Article 5 (commencing with Section 8680), Article 6 (commencing with Section 8720), Article 7 (commencing with Section 8750), Article 8 (commencing with Section 8780), and Article 10 (commencing with Section 8830) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(4) Article 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(b) The commercial boat registration shall not be revoked unless both the first and second convictions are related to the boat for which the
 commercial boat registration is to be revoked, and are for violations that occurred when the person convicted was the registrant or the registrant’s agent, servant, or employee, or acting under the registrant’s direction or control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 214.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.7.

Notwithstanding Sections 12000, 12001, and 12002, the commercial fishing license of the master of a vessel may be revoked or suspended by the commission, when requested by the department, for a period not to exceed one year, upon conviction of the master or his agent, servant, employee, or person acting under his direction or control, for a violation of Section 7121 or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, if the fish in question were taken from a vessel licensed pursuant to Section 7920.

However, a master’s license shall not be revoked for the conviction of a violation occurring when the person convicted was not acting as the master’s agent, servant, employee, or acting under his direction or control.

The master of a vessel is the person on board the vessel who is in charge of the vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Operative January 1, 1982, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.8.

(a) The court shall order the department to permanently revoke and the department shall permanently revoke, the commercial fishing license and any commercial fishing permits of any person convicted of either of the following:

(1) Taking or possessing abalone out of season.

(2) Taking or possessing abalone taken illegally from any area north of Point Sur.

(b) The court shall order the department to permanently revoke and the department shall permanently revoke the commercial fishing license and any commercial fishing permits of any person convicted of either of the following two offenses, if the
 person possessed more than 12 abalone at the time of the offense:

(1) Removing abalone from the shell or possessing abalone illegally removed from the shell.

(2) Taking or possessing abalone that are less than the minimum size.

(c) Any person sentenced pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall not thereafter be eligible for any license or permit to take or possess fish for sport or commercial purposes.

(d) In addition to any other applicable penalty, the commercial fishing license of the master of a vessel may be revoked or suspended by the commission, when requested by the department, for a period not to exceed one year, upon the second conviction in three years of the master or the master’s agent, servant, employee, or any other person acting under the
 master’s direction or control, for a violation of any of the following provisions or regulations adopted pursuant thereto:

(1) Article 2 (commencing with Section 8150.5), Article 3 (commencing with Section 8180), Article 4 (commencing with Section 8210.2), Article 5 (commencing with Section 8250), Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275), Article 9 (commencing with Section 8370), Article 13 (commencing with Section 8494), and Article 15 (commencing with Section 8550) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(2) Article 1 (commencing with Section 8601), Article 2 (commencing with Section 8623), Article 4 (commencing with Section 8660), Article 5 (commencing with Section 8680), Article 6 (commencing with Section 8720), Article 7 (commencing with Section 8750), Article 8 (commencing with Section 8780), and Article 10 (commencing with Section 8830) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division
 6.

(3) Article 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(e) A master’s license shall not be revoked unless both the first and second convictions are for a violation by the master or a violation occurring when the person convicted was acting as the master’s agent, servant, employee, or acting under the master’s direction or control.

(f) The master of a vessel is the person on board the vessel who is in charge of the vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 215.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.9.

In addition to any other penalty prescribed in this code, the license issued pursuant to Sections 8032 to 8036, inclusive, to a person who is convicted of a violation of Section 7121, 7364, 7370, 8372, or 8373 shall be suspended for not less than seven days nor more than 30 days. Each day a fish of the species designated in any of those sections is unlawfully possessed and each unlawful transaction involving the purchase or sale of a fish of those species by a wholesale fish dealer is a separate violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 105.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.10.

(a) When a complaint has been filed in a court of competent jurisdiction charging a person with a violation that may result in suspension or revocation of any license or permit to take abalone for commercial purposes, and no disposition of the complaint has occurred within 90 days after it has been filed in the court, the department may suspend the license or permit of that person.

(b) Whenever the department proposes to suspend a license or permit under this section, notice and an opportunity to be heard shall be given before taking the action. The notice shall contain a statement setting forth the proposed action and the grounds therefor, and notify the person of his or her right to a hearing as provided in this section. Within 10 days after the receipt of the notice from the department, the permitholder may request a hearing. The hearing shall be held by the commission at the next regularly scheduled hearing of the commission held more than 30 days after the notice of intent to suspend the permit was sent. The person shall be given 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing.

(c) A decision shall be made within a reasonable time on whether the license or permit shall be suspended until the disposition of the complaint by the court. In determining whether to order the suspension, the commission shall consider whether or not the violation could have a detrimental effect on the resources and whether or not a suspension is in the best public interest, and shall find whether there is sufficient evidence that a violation has occurred. A failure to make a finding that there is sufficient evidence that a violation has occurred, or a finding there is insufficient evidence, shall terminate the proceedings under this section.

(d) If the person is acquitted of the charges or the charges are dismissed, any suspension under this section is thereby terminated.

(e) No complaint shall be filed in a court charging a commercial abalone violation, unless evidence supporting the charge has been reviewed by the appropriate county or city prosecuting agency and a criminal complaint has been issued by that agency.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8306.7 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 787, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.11.

Upon the second conviction of any person of a violation of Section 3087 or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, in any five-year period, and upon any conviction subsequent to the two convictions during a five-year period, it shall be unlawful for that person to conduct any of the activities described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3087 for three years from the date of the last conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 136.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

Notwithstanding Section 12002, a second or subsequent violation of Section 8670 is punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than four thousand dollars ($4,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 103.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.1.

(a) Unless a minimum punishment is otherwise provided, the punishment for the knowing and intentional taking of a mammal, bird, or fish in excess of the quantity permitted by other provisions of this code or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, not in compliance with size or sex limitations in other provisions of this code or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or from which only external body parts, including, but not limited to, antlers, horns, hides, feathers, or fins, are removed for use in violation of this code or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, shall be not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first violation and not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days for a second or subsequent violation. The court shall apply not less than the minimum punishment as specified in this subdivision except in those cases where the court determines that, as to the imprisonment sentence only, the interests of justice would best be served by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of imprisonment sentence.

(b) If the court grants probation to any person punished under subdivision (a), in addition to any other terms or conditions imposed by the court, the court may impose as a condition of that probation that the person perform not more than 100 hours of community service in the county in which the violation occurred. To the extent practicable, the service shall involve work relating to natural resources. The service shall be performed during a time that does not interfere with the person’s school attendance or employment. If the court requires a person to perform community service under this subdivision, that person shall also be required to attend a hunter safety course as described in Section 3051. The person, and not the court, shall be responsible for paying all fees and costs related to the course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 771, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.2.

Notwithstanding Section 12002 or 12008, the punishment for any violation of Section 4500 or 4700 is a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each unlawful taking, imprisonment in a county jail for the period prescribed in Section 12002 or 12008, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.5.

(a) The penalty for a first violation of Section 8610.3 or 8610.4 is a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and a mandatory suspension of any license, permit, or stamp to take, receive, transport, purchase, sell, barter, or process fish for commercial purposes for six months. The penalty for a second or subsequent violation of Section 8610.3 or 8610.4 is a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and a mandatory suspension of any license, permit, or stamp to take, receive, transport, purchase, sell, barter, or process fish for commercial purposes for one year.

(b) If a person convicted of a violation of Section 8610.3 or 8610.4, is granted probation, the court shall impose as a term or condition of probation, in addition to any other term or condition of probation, a requirement that the person pay at least the minimum fine prescribed in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12004.

(a) The punishment for a first conviction of a violation of Section 8685.5, 8685.6, 8685.7, or 8688 is a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed six months, or the revocation of any license issued pursuant to Sections 8032 to 8036, inclusive, or any combination of these penalties.

(b) The punishment for a second or subsequent conviction of a violation of Section 8685.5, 8685.6, 8685.7, or 8688, which offense occurred within five years of another offense which resulted in a conviction of Section 8685.5, 8685.6, 8685.7, or 8688 is a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or imprisonment pursuant to
 subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed one year, or the revocation of any license issued pursuant to Sections 8032 to 8036, inclusive, or any combination of these penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 116.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

12005.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12000, and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the punishment for each violation of Section 4758 shall include both of the following:

(1) A fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each bear part. As used in this paragraph, “bear part” means an individual part or group of like parts of any bear that the defendant knowingly and unlawfully sells, purchases, or possesses for sale. For the purposes of this paragraph, claws, paws, or teeth from a single bear that are knowingly purchased, sold, or possessed for sale with the intent that they be delivered to a single end user shall be considered a single part.

(2) An additional fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) If the conviction is for the possession of two bear gallbladders and probation is granted, or if the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition thereof that a minimum term of 30 days shall be served in a county jail.

(c) (1) The possession of three or more bear gallbladders is punishable by both of the following:

(A) The fine specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) An additional fine of not more
 than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) If probation is granted, or the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition thereof that a minimum term of three months shall be served in a county jail.

(d) Consecutive sentences shall be imposed for separate violations of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 117.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

12005.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 12000 and 12002, a violation of Section 3003.1 or 3003.2, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, is punishable by a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. The Legislature may increase, but may not decrease, these penalties.

(History: Added November 3, 1998, by initiative Proposition 4, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12006.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12002:

(1) The punishment for a violation of Section 7370 is a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) The punishment for a violation of Section 8254 is a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) The court shall permanently revoke any commercial fishing license or commercial fishing permit, and may permanently revoke any sport fishing license issued to the violator by the department. Any vessel, diving or other fishing gear or apparatus, or vehicle used in the commission of an offense subject to this section may be seized and may be ordered forfeited by the court pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12157. Fifty percent of the revenue deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund from fines and forfeitures collected pursuant to this section shall be allocated for the support of the Special Operations Unit of the department, and used for law enforcement purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 328, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12006.6.

Notwithstanding Section 12000 or 12002.8, and in addition to Section 12009, and notwithstanding the type of fishing license or permit held, if any person is convicted of a violation of Section 5521 or 5521.5, and the offense occurs in an area closed to the taking of abalone for commercial purposes, and the person takes or possesses more than 12 abalone at one time or takes abalone in excess of the annual bag limit, that person shall be punished by all of the following:

(a)A fine of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

(b) The court shall order the department to permanently revoke, and the department shall permanently revoke, the commercial fishing license and any commercial fishing permits of that person. The person punished under this subdivision shall not, thereafter, be eligible for any license or permit to take or possess fish for sport or commercial purposes, including, but not limited to, a commercial fishing license or a sport fishing or sport ocean fishing license. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commercial license or permit of a person arrested for a violation punishable under this section may not be sold, transferred, loaned, leased, or used as security for any financial transaction until disposition of the charges is final.

(c) Any vessel, diving or other fishing gear or apparatus, or vehicle used in the commission of an offense punishable under this section shall be seized, and shall be ordered forfeited in the same manner prescribed for nets or traps used in violation of this code, as described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 8630) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 6, or in the manner prescribed in Section 12157.

(d) Not less than 50 percent of the revenue deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund from fines and forfeitures collected pursuant to this section shall be allocated for the support of the Special Operations Unit of the Wildlife Protection Division of the department and used for law enforcement purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 753, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

12007.

Notwithstanding Section 12002, the punishment for (1) a second or subsequent violation of Section 1602 or 1605 on the same project or streambed alteration agreement; (2) each violation of Section 2270, 2271, 6400, 6400.5, 15202, 15509, or 15600; or (3) each violation of any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 15510, is a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one year, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12008.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 597 of the Penal Code, the punishment for a violation of any of the following provisions is a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment:

(a) Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3.

(b) Section 3511.

(c) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4700) of Part 3 of Division 4.

(d) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5050) of Division 5.

(e) Section 5515.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12008.1.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 12002 or Section 12008, the punishment for any violation of Section 2080 or 2085 is a fine of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each violation or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the moneys collected from any fine or forfeiture imposed or collected for violating Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 shall be deposited as follows:

(1) One-half in the Endangered Species Permitting Account established pursuant to Section 2081.2.

(2) One-half in the county treasury of the county in which the violation occurred. The board of supervisors shall first use revenues pursuant to this subdivision to reimburse the costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting the violation. Any excess revenues may be expended in accordance with Section 13103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 216.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12008.5.

Notwithstanding Section 12000, the punishment for taking any bighorn sheep in violation of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4900) of Part 3 of Division 4, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, is a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 745, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12009.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12000, and except as provided in Section 12006.6, the punishment for a violation of any provision of Section 5521 or 5521.5, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or of Section 7121 involving abalone, is a fine of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) and imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one year. The court shall permanently revoke any commercial fishing license, commercial fishing permit, or sport fishing license issued by the department. Any vessel, diving or other fishing gear or apparatus, or vehicle used in the commission of an offense punishable under this section, may be seized and may be ordered forfeited by the court pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12157. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commercial license of any person arrested for a violation punishable under this section may not be sold, transferred, loaned, or leased, or used as security for any financial transaction until disposition of the charges is final.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money collected from any fine or forfeiture imposed or collected for the taking of abalone for any purpose other than for profit in violation of this article or any other provision of law shall be deposited as follows:

(1) One-half in the Abalone Restoration and Preservation Account.

(2) One-half in the county treasury of the county in which the violation occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12010.

Notwithstanding Section 12002, the maximum punishment for each violation of Section 3503.5 relating to a bird-of-prey that is either designated as endangered, threatened, or fully protected, or taken from the wild and subsequently reported to the department as having been bred in captivity, is a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not to exceed one year, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 217.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12011.

(a) In addition to the penalty provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 12002, any person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 5650 is subject to an additional fine of all of the following:

(1) Not more than ten dollars ($10) for each gallon or pound of material discharged. The amount of the fine shall be reduced for every gallon or pound of the illegally discharged material that is recovered and properly disposed of by the responsible party. 

(2) An amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the state or local agency for cleanup and abatement and to fully mitigate all actual damages to fish, plant, bird, or animal life and habitat. 

(3) Where the state or local agency is required to undertake cleanup or remedial action because the responsible person refuses or is unable to fully clean up the discharge, an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred by the state or local agency, in addition to the amount of funds, if any, expended by the responsible person, in cleaning up the illegally discharged material or abating its effects, or both cleaning up and abating those effects.

(b) Notwithstanding the jurisdiction of the department over illegal discharges and pollution as provided in Section 5650, the fines specified in this section do not apply to discharges in compliance with a national pollution discharge elimination system permit or a state or regional board waste discharge permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12012.

(a) A person who illegally takes, possesses, imports, exports, sells, purchases, barters, trades, or exchanges a bird, fish, mammal, reptile, amphibian, or part of any of those animals, for profit or personal gain, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) If a person is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subdivision (a), that person shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more
 than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) If a second or subsequent violation of subdivision (a) also involves a violation of Section 8685.5, 8685.6, 8685.7, or 8688 that is punishable by subdivision (b) of Section 12004, the offense shall be punishable by a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12004, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 802 of the Penal Code, prosecution of an offense punishable under this section shall be commenced within three years after commission of the offense.

(e) This section does not apply to fish taken pursuant to a commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7852, or fish sold pursuant to a commercial fish business license issued in accordance with Article 7
 (commencing with Section 8030) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(f) This section does not supersede Section 12005 or 12009.

(g) (1) Moneys equivalent to 50 percent of the revenue deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund from fines and forfeitures collected pursuant to this section shall be allocated for the support of the Special Operations Unit of the department, and used for law enforcement purposes.

(2) Moneys equivalent to 50 percent of the revenue from any fine collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the county in which the offense was committed, pursuant to Section 13003. The board of supervisors shall first use revenues pursuant to this subdivision to reimburse the costs incurred by the district attorney or city attorney in investigating and prosecuting the
 violation. Any excess revenues may be expended in accordance with Section 13103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 106.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12012.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12000 or any other provision of this code, a person who holds a commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7850) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6, or is operating a commercial passenger fishing boat licensed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 7920) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6, and, for commercial purposes, either unlawfully takes a fish, within any meaning provided in Section 86, within a marine protected area, as defined in Section 2852, or engages in, or knowingly facilitates another person’s, fishing activity within the marine protected area, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars
 ($5,000) nor more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) If a person is convicted of a second or subsequent violation that is punishable pursuant to subdivision (a) and the violation occurred within 10 years of a prior violation that is
 punishable pursuant to subdivision (a) that resulted in a conviction, the department may suspend that person’s license described in subdivision (a), as applicable, or other privilege issued pursuant to this code, and that person shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) A person whose license or other privilege is suspended pursuant to this section may appeal the suspension to the commission. The commission shall initiate the appeal process within 12 months
 of the violator’s appeal request. The commission shall consider at least the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the person’s violations, the person’s culpability for the violations, and the injury to natural resources by the violations, and may restore a person’s license or other privileges.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 802 of the Penal Code, prosecution of an offense punishable under this section shall be commenced within three years after commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 189, Sec. 4.   (AB 2369)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12013.

(a) Any person who illegally takes or possesses in the field more than three times the daily bag limit, or who illegally possesses more than three times the legal possession limit, of fish, reptiles, birds, amphibians, or mammals is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), nor more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) If a person is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subdivision (a), that person shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or imprisonment in a
 county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.
